ja: スピンドルベアリング面素材: セラミック; ガラス; 金属; プラスチック/樹脂; 石; 木; その他
nl: Spindel lageroppervlak materiaal: Keramiek; Glas; Metaal; Plastic/hars; Steen; Hout; Overige
nb: Spindellagerets overflatemateriale: Keramikk; Glass; Metall; Plast/harpiks; Stein; Tre; Annet
it: Materiale della superficie di appoggio del fuso: Ceramica; Vetro; Metallo; Plastica/resina; Pietra; Legno; Altro
hr-HR: Materijal ležajne površine vretena: Keramika; Staklo; Metal; Plastika/smola; Kamen; Drvo; Ostalo
th: วัสดุพื้นผิวของตลับลูกปืนแกนหมุน: เซรามิก; แก้ว; โลหะ; พลาสติก/เรซิน; หิน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał powierzchni łożyska wrzeciona: Ceramika; Szkło; Metal; Plastik/żywica; Kamień; Drewno; Inne
ru: Материал опорной поверхности веретена: Керамика; Стекло; Металл; Пластик/смола; Камень; Дерево; Другое
pt-PT: Material da superfície de apoio do fuso: Cerâmica; Vidro; Metal; Plástico/resina; Pedra; Madeira; Outro
sv: Spindellagerytans material: Keramik; Glas; Metall; Plast/harts; Sten; Trä; Annat
fi: Värttinän laakerin pintamateriaali: Keraaminen; Lasi; Metalli; Muovi/hartsi; Kivi; Puu; Muu
ro-RO: Material al suprafeței de contact a rulmentului pentru fus: Ceramică; Sticlă; Metal; Plastic/Rășină; Piatră; Lemn; Altele
tr: Mil yatağı yüzey malzemesi: Seramik; Cam; Metal; Plastik/reçine; Taş; Ahşap; Diğer
fr: Matériau de la surface d’appui du fuseau: Céramique; Verre; Métal; Plastique / Résine; Pierre; Bois; Autre
zh-TW: 紡綞軸承表面材質: 陶瓷; 玻璃; 金屬; 塑膠/樹脂; 石材; 木材; 其他
cs: Materiál povrchu ložiska vřetena: Keramika; Sklo; Kov; Plast/pryskyřice; Kámen; Dřevo; Jiné
ko: 스핀들 베어링 표면 소재: 세라믹; 유리; 금속; 플라스틱/수지; 석재; 목재; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на лагерната повърхност на шпиндела: Керамика; Стъкло; Метал; Пластмаса/смола; Камък; Дърво; Друго
zh-CN: 主轴轴承表面材料: 陶瓷; 玻璃; 金属; 塑料/树脂; 石材; 木材; 其他
de: Material der Spindel-Lagerfläche: Keramik; Glas; Metall; Kunststoff/Harz; Stein; Holz; Sonstige
lt-LT: Verpstės atraminio paviršiaus medžiaga: Keramika; Stiklas; Metalas; Plastikas / derva; Akmuo; Mediena; Kita
es: Material de la superficie de apoyo del huso: Cerámica; Vidrio; Metal; Plástico/resina; Piedra; Madera; Otro
sk-SK: Materiál povrchu ložiska vretena: Keramika; Sklo; Kov; Plast/živica; Kameň; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Fuso superfície de apoio material: Cerâmica; Vidro; Metal; Plástico/Resina; Pedra; Madeira; Outros
da: Materiale i spindlens lejeflade: Keramisk; Glas; Metal; Plastik/harpiks; Sten; Træ; Andet
hu: Orsócsapágy felületének anyaga: Kerámia; Üveg; Fém; Műanyag/gyanta; Kő; Fa; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material ležajne površine vretena: Keramika; Steklo; Kovina; Umetna masa/smola; Kamen; Les; Drugo
en: Spindle bearing surface material: Ceramic; Glass; Metal; Plastic/Resin; Stone; Wood; Other
vi: Vật liệu bề mặt ổ trục chính: Gốm; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Nhựa/Nhựa thông; Đá; Gỗ; Khác
el: Υλικό επιφάνειας έδρασης ατράκτου: Κεραμικό; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό/Ρητίνη; Πέτρα; Ξύλο; Άλλο